Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.290

Catheterization of public and private school students—Immunity from liability.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) In the event a school employee provides for the catheterization of a student pursuant to RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280 in substantial compliance with (a) rules adopted by the *state nursing care quality assurance commission and the instructions of a registered nurse or **advanced registered nurse practitioner issued under such rules, and (b) written policies of the school district or private school, then the employee, the employee's school district or school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief administrator thereof shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in their individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of providing for the catheterization.

(2) Providing for the catheterization of any student pursuant to RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280 may be discontinued by a public school district or private school and the school district or school, its employees, its chief administrator, and members of its governing board shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in their individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of the discontinuance: PROVIDED, That the chief administrator of the public school district or private school, or his or her designee, has first provided actual notice orally or in writing in advance of the date of discontinuance to a parent or legal guardian of the student or other person having legal control over the student: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the public school district otherwise provides for the catheterization of the student to the extent required by federal or state law.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 722; 1990 c 33 s 209; 1988 c 48 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.31.165.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

**(2) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.